Washington statutes.
RCW 19.27.032

Amendment—Timeline—Requirements—Public access.

(1) Adoption or amendment of the state building code or statewide amendments to the state building code as defined in RCW 19.27.031 must meet the following criteria:

(a) Substantive updates to the state building code shall occur only once during the three-year state building code adoption cycle as described in RCW 19.27.031(3). No substantive provision may be adopted, amended, or repealed except during the three-year code adoption cycle, or as provided in (c) or (d) of this subsection.

(b) An interim code adoption cycle as outlined in RCW 19.27.031(4) shall not be performed earlier than 12 months nor later than 18 months from the effective date of the codes adopted pursuant to (a) of this subsection.

(c)(i) The council may adopt emergency amendments to the code at any time under the following conditions:

(A) The amendment is necessary for the preservation of the public health, safety, or general welfare; or

(B) The amendment is necessary for consistency with state or federal laws and regulations.

(ii) The council may not act on a petition for emergency statewide amendments at the meeting when the petition is introduced.

(iii) The council may accept a petition for emergency statewide amendments only when the petition provides a concise statement of the reasons for a finding that an emergency basis exists, and the council approves a finding that such an emergency basis exists by a two-thirds vote of voting members. The approval of emergency amendments requires a majority vote of the voting members.

(d) The council may adopt or amend the state building code or code sections at any time pursuant to legislative direction as reflected in legislation signed into law.

(2) Any person or entity may submit to the council a petition in writing for statewide amendments within the time periods established by the council. The petition for statewide amendment must comply with format and content requirements approved by the council.

(3) Incomplete petitions for statewide amendments or petitions that exceed the specific delegation of authority provided by the legislature shall not be considered by the council for action.

(4) The council shall approve the referral of a statewide amendment to a standing committee or technical advisory group.

(5) The council shall develop a process for council meetings that allows members of the public to understand amendments being proposed for adoption. The process shall include requirements for modifications to proposed rule text to be in writing, specify the reason for the amendment, and be available to the council and the members of the public at least seven days prior to a vote on final amendment adoption. The council shall adopt rules that encourage councilmembers and technical advisory group members to make proposed amendments and text changes available to other members and the public at least 48 hours prior to the meeting at which they will be discussed.

(6) The council must adopt policies and procedures for the adoption or amendment of the state building code that comply with the rule-making requirements in chapter 34.05 RCW and chapter 170, Laws of 2024.

[ 2024 c 170 s 6.]